third_party/hunspell_dictionaries/fo_FO/fo_FO.aff
FLAG num
#devulskap
SFX 729 N 12
SFX 729 0 skap .
SFX 729 0 skapa .
SFX 729 0 skapanna .
SFX 729 0 skapi .
SFX 729 0 skapið .
SFX 729 0 skapinum .
SFX 729 0 skaps .
SFX 729 0 skapsins .
SFX 729 0 skøp .
SFX 729 0 skøpini .
SFX 729 0 skøpum .
SFX 729 0 skøpunum .

#kavaplógv
SFX 730 N 10
SFX 730 v num .
SFX 730 v s .
SFX 730 v sins .
SFX 730 0 a .
SFX 730 0 anna .
SFX 730 0 i .
SFX 730 0 ið .
SFX 730 0 ini .
SFX 730 0 um .
SFX 730 0 unum .

#postnummar
SFX 731 N 11
SFX 731 m rinum .
SFX 731 m rum .
SFX 731 m runum .
SFX 731 0 ar .
SFX 731 0 ari .
SFX 731 0 arið .
SFX 731 0 arini .
SFX 731 0 ars .
SFX 731 0 arsins .
SFX 731 0 ur .
SFX 731 0 urini .

#búffil
SFX 732 N 13
SFX 732 f la .
SFX 732 f lanna .
SFX 732 f lar .
SFX 732 f larnar .
SFX 732 f larnir .
SFX 732 f li .
SFX 732 f linum .
SFX 732 f lum .
SFX 732 f lunum .
SFX 732 0 il .
SFX 732 0 ilin .
SFX 732 0 ils .
SFX 732 0 ilsins .

#rummanareiggj
SFX 733 N 10
SFX 733 gj num .
SFX 733 gj s .
SFX 733 gj sins .
SFX 733 j i .
SFX 733 j ið .
SFX 733 j ini .
SFX 733 0 a .
SFX 733 0 anna .
SFX 733 0 um .
SFX 733 0 unum .

#strimmil
SFX 734 N 13
SFX 734 m la .
SFX 734 m lanna .
SFX 734 m lar .
SFX 734 m larnar .
SFX 734 m larnir .
SFX 734 m li .
SFX 734 m linum .
SFX 734 m lum .
SFX 734 m lunum .
SFX 734 0 il .
SFX 734 0 ilin .
SFX 734 0 ils .
SFX 734 0 ilsins .

#kapittul
SFX 735 N 11
SFX 735 t la .
SFX 735 t lanna .
SFX 735 t li .
SFX 735 t lið .
SFX 735 t lini .
SFX 735 t linum .
SFX 735 t lum .
SFX 735 t lunum .
SFX 735 0 ul .
SFX 735 0 uls .
SFX 735 0 ulsins .

#svartaskøta
SFX 736 N 10
SFX 736 0 a .
SFX 736 0 an .
SFX 736 0 anna .
SFX 736 0 u .
SFX 736 0 um .
SFX 736 0 uni .
SFX 736 0 unnar .
SFX 736 0 unum .
SFX 736 0 ur .
SFX 736 0 urnar .

#miskunnsamur
SFX 737 N 9
SFX 737 n som .
SFX 737 n somum .
SFX 737 0 sama .
SFX 737 0 saman .
SFX 737 0 samar .
SFX 737 0 samari .
SFX 737 0 samir .
SFX 737 0 samt .
SFX 737 0 samur .

#hvessa
SFX 738 N 3
SFX 738 t ti .
SFX 738 t tu .
SFX 738 0 ur .

#snuddur
SFX 739 N 14
SFX 739 d s .
SFX 739 d sins .
SFX 739 0 a .
SFX 739 0 anna .
SFX 739 0 i .
SFX 739 0 in .
SFX 739 0 inum .
SFX 739 0 ir .
SFX 739 0 irnar .
SFX 739 0 irnir .
SFX 739 0 um .
SFX 739 0 unum .
SFX 739 0 ur .
SFX 739 0 urin .

#lítilsvirða
SFX 740 N 3
SFX 740 0 i .
SFX 740 0 u .
SFX 740 0 ur .

#vavvur
SFX 741 N 14
SFX 741 v s .
SFX 741 v sins .
SFX 741 0 a .
SFX 741 0 anna .
SFX 741 0 ar .
SFX 741 0 arnar .
SFX 741 0 arnir .
SFX 741 0 i .
SFX 741 0 in .
SFX 741 0 inum .
SFX 741 0 um .
SFX 741 0 unum .
SFX 741 0 ur .
SFX 741 0 urin .

#handikur
SFX 742 N 15
SFX 742 0 ik .
SFX 742 0 ika .
SFX 742 0 ikanna .
SFX 742 0 ikar .
SFX 742 0 ikarnar .
SFX 742 0 ikarnir .
SFX 742 0 iki .
SFX 742 0 ikin .
SFX 742 0 ikinum .
SFX 742 0 iks .
SFX 742 0 iksins .
SFX 742 0 ikum .
SFX 742 0 ikunum .
SFX 742 0 ikur .
SFX 742 0 ikurin .

#avgerð
SFX 743 N 10
SFX 743 0 anna .
SFX 743 0 ar .
SFX 743 0 arinnar .
SFX 743 0 in .
SFX 743 0 ina .
SFX 743 0 ini .
SFX 743 0 ir .
SFX 743 0 irnar .
SFX 743 0 um .
SFX 743 0 unum .

#krógv
SFX 744 N 1
SFX 744 0 nni .

#trímenningur
SFX 745 N 15
SFX 745 0 menning .
SFX 745 0 menninga .
SFX 745 0 menninganna .
SFX 745 0 menningar .
SFX 745 0 menningarnar .
SFX 745 0 menningarnir .
SFX 745 0 menningi .
SFX 745 0 menningin .
SFX 745 0 menninginum .
SFX 745 0 mennings .
SFX 745 0 menningsins .
SFX 745 0 menningum .
SFX 745 0 menningunum .
SFX 745 0 menningur .
SFX 745 0 menningurin .

#høvundur
SFX 746 N 15
SFX 746 0 a .
SFX 746 0 anna .
SFX 746 0 ar .
SFX 746 0 arins .
SFX 746 0 arnar .
SFX 746 0 arnir .
SFX 746 0 i .
SFX 746 0 in .
SFX 746 0 inum .
SFX 746 0 s .
SFX 746 0 sins .
SFX 746 0 um .
SFX 746 0 unum .
SFX 746 0 ur .
SFX 746 0 urin .

#glyvur
SFX 747 N 9
SFX 747 0 ra .
SFX 747 0 ranna .
SFX 747 0 ri .
SFX 747 0 rinum .
SFX 747 0 rum .
SFX 747 0 runum .
SFX 747 0 ur .
SFX 747 0 urs .
SFX 747 0 ursins .

#Signabøur
SFX 748 N 3
SFX 748 0 ar .
SFX 748 0 i .
SFX 748 0 ur .

#fiskaslógv
SFX 749 N 5
SFX 749 v num .
SFX 749 v s .
SFX 749 v sins .
SFX 749 0 i .
SFX 749 0 ið .

#lítlatá
SFX 750 N 6
SFX 750 0 a .
SFX 750 0 anna .
SFX 750 0 ar .
SFX 750 0 arinnar .
SFX 750 0 nna .
SFX 750 0 nni .

#handika
SFX 751 N 11
SFX 751 0 ika .
SFX 751 0 ikan .
SFX 751 0 ikanna .
SFX 751 0 iku .
SFX 751 0 ikum .
SFX 751 0 ikuna .
SFX 751 0 ikuni .
SFX 751 0 ikunnar .
SFX 751 0 ikunum .
SFX 751 0 ikur .
SFX 751 0 ikurnar .

#vanyrða
SFX 752 N 4
SFX 752 ð t .
SFX 752 0 a .
SFX 752 0 ar .
SFX 752 0 ir .

#fanatikari
SFX 753 N 12
SFX 753 0 ikara .
SFX 753 0 ikaran .
SFX 753 0 ikaranna .
SFX 753 0 ikarans .
SFX 753 0 ikaranum .
SFX 753 0 ikarar .
SFX 753 0 ikararnar .
SFX 753 0 ikararnir .
SFX 753 0 ikari .
SFX 753 0 ikarin .
SFX 753 0 ikarum .
SFX 753 0 ikarunum .

#styðja
SFX 754 N 7
SFX 754 j ja .
SFX 754 j ur .
SFX 754 0 a .
SFX 754 0 að .
SFX 754 0 aði .
SFX 754 0 aðu .
SFX 754 0 ar .

#kviðin
SFX 755 N 4
SFX 755 0 na .
SFX 755 0 nar .
SFX 755 0 nari .
SFX 755 0 num .

#beddur
SFX 756 N 7
SFX 756 d s .
SFX 756 d sins .
SFX 756 0 i .
SFX 756 0 in .
SFX 756 0 inum .
SFX 756 0 ur .
SFX 756 0 urin .

#sparl
SFX 757 N 1
SFX 757 0 unum .

#tindklárt
SFX 758 N 2
SFX 758 0 t .
SFX 758 0 um .

#bilgjast
SFX 759 N 4
SFX 759 d ist .
SFX 759 d st .
SFX 759 0 ist .
SFX 759 0 ust .

#Evropasamveldið
SFX 760 N 3
SFX 760 0 ið .
SFX 760 0 inum .
SFX 760 0 isins .

#lítlasystir
SFX 761 N 2
SFX 761 0 ir .
SFX 761 0 irin .

#einskilja
SFX 762 N 9
SFX 762 d di .
SFX 762 d du .
SFX 762 d ir .
SFX 762 d ja .
SFX 762 d t .
SFX 762 d ti .
SFX 762 d tu .
SFX 762 d ur .
SFX 762 0 ur .

#goff
SFX 763 N 5
SFX 763 f s .
SFX 763 f sins .
SFX 763 0 i .
SFX 763 0 ið .
SFX 763 0 inum .

#samvendir
SFX 764 N 3
SFX 764 0 ar .
SFX 764 0 ir .
SFX 764 0 um .

#rættskaffin
SFX 765 N 8
SFX 765 f na .
SFX 765 f nan .
SFX 765 f nar .
SFX 765 f nari .
SFX 765 f nir .
SFX 765 f num .
SFX 765 0 ið .
SFX 765 0 in .

#javnseta
SFX 766 N 6
SFX 766 t a .
SFX 766 t t .
SFX 766 t ti .
SFX 766 t tu .
SFX 766 t ur .
SFX 766 0 ur .

#moli
SFX 767 N 11
SFX 767 0 a .
SFX 767 0 an .
SFX 767 0 anna .
SFX 767 0 ans .
SFX 767 0 anum .
SFX 767 0 ar .
SFX 767 0 arnar .
SFX 767 0 arnir .
SFX 767 0 i .
SFX 767 0 in .
SFX 767 0 unum .

#kalin
SFX 768 N 7
SFX 768 0 ið .
SFX 768 0 in .
SFX 768 0 nan .
SFX 768 0 nar .
SFX 768 0 nari .
SFX 768 0 nir .
SFX 768 0 num .

#Norðsjógvurin
SFX 769 N 3
SFX 769 0 in .
SFX 769 0 inum .
SFX 769 0 urin .

#tola
SFX 770 N 7
SFX 770 d a .
SFX 770 d að .
SFX 770 d di .
SFX 770 d du .
SFX 770 d ir .
SFX 770 d t .
SFX 770 0 ur .

#vanyrða
SFX 771 N 6
SFX 771 0 að .
SFX 771 0 aði .
SFX 771 0 aðu .
SFX 771 0 i .
SFX 771 0 u .
SFX 771 0 ur .

#bráðasótt
SFX 772 N 4
SFX 772 0 ar .
SFX 772 0 arinnar .
SFX 772 0 ina .
SFX 772 0 ini .

#glammur
SFX 773 N 7
SFX 773 m s .
SFX 773 m sins .
SFX 773 0 i .
SFX 773 0 in .
SFX 773 0 inum .
SFX 773 0 ur .
SFX 773 0 urin .

#Funningur
SFX 774 N 4
SFX 774 0 ing .
SFX 774 0 ingi .
SFX 774 0 ings .
SFX 774 0 ingur .

#avvápnaðarsamráðingar
SFX 775 N 6
SFX 775 0 inga .
SFX 775 0 inganna .
SFX 775 0 ingar .
SFX 775 0 ingarnar .
SFX 775 0 ingum .
SFX 775 0 ingunum .

#Norðoyatunnilin
SFX 776 N 7
SFX 776 0 anna .
SFX 776 0 arnar .
SFX 776 0 arnir .
SFX 776 0 in .
SFX 776 0 inum .
SFX 776 0 sins .
SFX 776 0 unum .

#nývøkstur
SFX 777 N 9
SFX 777 0 ri .
SFX 777 0 rinum .
SFX 777 0 rir .
SFX 777 0 rirnar .
SFX 777 0 rirnir .
SFX 777 0 rum .
SFX 777 0 runum .
SFX 777 0 ur .
SFX 777 0 urin .

#lítlasystir
SFX 778 N 10
SFX 778 0 ra .
SFX 778 0 ranna .
SFX 778 0 rar .
SFX 778 0 rarnar .
SFX 778 0 rina .
SFX 778 0 rini .
SFX 778 0 rum .
SFX 778 0 runum .
SFX 778 0 ur .
SFX 778 0 urinnar .

#ástaður
SFX 779 N 13
SFX 779 0 a .
SFX 779 0 anna .
SFX 779 0 ar .
SFX 779 0 arins .
SFX 779 0 i .
SFX 779 0 in .
SFX 779 0 inum .
SFX 779 0 ir .
SFX 779 0 irnar .
SFX 779 0 irnir .
SFX 779 0 num .
SFX 779 0 ur .
SFX 779 0 urin .

#lítilsvirða
SFX 780 N 3
SFX 780 ð t .
SFX 780 0 a .
SFX 780 0 ir .

#Depil
SFX 781 N 3
SFX 781 0 il .
SFX 781 0 ils .
SFX 781 0 li .
